Utah statutes.
13-47-203 (Contingently Repealed).   Voluntary registration by private employer certifying participation in verification.

(1) (a)  A private employer may register with the department certifying that the private employer is in compliance with Section 13-47-201.

(b)  A private employer may register with the department under this section regardless of whether the private employer is required to comply with Section 13-47-201.

(2)  To register or renew a registration with the department under this part, a private employer shall:

(a)  file a registration statement with the department that certifies compliance with Section 13-47-201; and

(b)  pay a fee established by the department in accordance Section 63J-1-504 that reflects the cost of registering employers under this section and publishing the list described in Section 13-47-204.

(3)  A registration under this part expires every two years on the anniversary of the day on which the registration is filed with the department.

(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules to provide for:

(a)  the form of a registration statement under this section;

(b)  the process of filing a registration statement under this section; and

(c)  the process of renewing a registration statement under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 403, 2010 General Session

